Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-513
Natural resources districts; board of directors; terms; subdistricts; qualifications; nonpartisan ballot.

Except as provided in section 2-3213, candidates for the board of directors of natural resources districts shall be elected for four-year terms at the statewide general election. The number of directors, the length of their terms, and the subdistrict which they are to represent if any shall be determined by the board of directors pursuant to sections 2-3213 and 2-3214. Candidates for the board of directors shall meet the qualifications found in section 2-3214. District directors shall be elected on the nonpartisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 109.